test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-chaalmtem_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - čââʹlmteʹm e-stem: # Adjective 'poor-sighted/huononäköinen'  - full paradigm
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Attr: čââʹlmteʹmes
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: čââʹlmteʹm
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: čââʹlmteeʹm
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: čââʹlmteeʹm
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill: čââʹlmtemma
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Loc: čââʹlmteeʹmest
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com: čââʹlmteeʹmin
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Ess: čââʹlmteeʹmen
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Par: čââʹlmteeʹmed
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe: [čââʹlmteeʹmtaa, čââʹlmteeʹmtää]
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: čââʹlmteeʹm
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: čââʹlmteeʹmi
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: čââʹlmteeʹmid
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill: čââʹlmteeʹmid
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Loc: čââʹlmteeʹmin
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com: čââʹlmteeʹmivuiʹm
     čââʹlmteʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe: [čââʹlmteeʹmitaa, čââʹlmteeʹmitää]
